Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

40-10.1-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 10.1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advertise" means to advise, announce, give notice of, publish, or call attention to by use of any oral, written, or graphic statement made in a newspaper or other publication, on radio, television, or any electronic medium, or contained in any notice, handbill, sign, including signage on a vehicle, flyer, catalog, or letter, or printed on or contained in any tag or label attached to or accompanying any article of personal property.

(1.5) "Authorized or interested person" means:

The vehicle owner, authorized operator, or authorized agent of the owner of the vehicle;

The lienholder of the vehicle or agent of the lienholder of the vehicle; or

If the owner signs a release authorizing an insurance company to act on behalf of the owner, the insurance company or agent of the insurance company providing insurance coverage on the vehicle.

"Certificate" means the certificate of public convenience and necessity issued to a common carrier under part 2 of this article.

"Commission" means the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado.

"Common carrier" means a common carrier as defined in section 40-1-102; except that the term does not include:

A contract carrier as defined in this section;

A motor carrier of passengers under part 3 of this article 10.1; or

A motor carrier of passengers providing large-market taxicab service under part 7 of this article 10.1.

(4.5) "Common parking area" means any part of the following areas that are normally used for parking, such as the side of a street or parking spaces, that an owner does not have the right to exclude other residents of the following from using for parking:

A condominium, as defined in section 38-33.3-103 (9);

A cooperative, as defined in section 38-33.3-103 (10);

A multifamily building, which is also known as an apartment complex, with separate living quarters that are rented or leased separately; or

A mobile home park, as defined in section 38-12-201.5 (6).

"Compensation" means any money, property, service, or thing of value charged or received or to be charged or received, whether directly or indirectly.

"Contract carrier" means every person, other than a common carrier or a motor carrier of passengers under part 3 of this article, who, by special contract, directly or indirectly affords a means of passenger transportation over any public highway of this state; except that the term does not include a transportation network company, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3), or a transportation network company driver, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (4).

(6.5) "Drop fee" means a fee a towing operator charges to unhook a vehicle from a tow truck.

"Fixed points" and "established route" mean points or a route between or over which any common carrier usually or ordinarily operates or holds out to operate any motor vehicle, even though there may be departures from such points or route, whether such departures are periodic or irregular.

"Household goods" means the personal effects and property used or to be used in a dwelling, when a part of the equipment or supply of such dwelling, and similar property if the transportation of such effects and property is:

Arranged and paid for by the householder; except that "household goods" does not include property moving from a factory or store, other than property that the householder has purchased with intent to use in his or her dwelling and that is transported at the request of, and the transportation charges are paid to the mover by, the householder; or

Arranged and paid for by another party.

"Intrastate commerce" means transportation for compensation by motor vehicles over the public highways between points in this state.

(9.5) "Large-market taxicab service" means indiscriminate passenger transportation for compensation in a taxicab on a call-and-demand basis, within and between points in the counties of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, Broomfield, Denver, Douglas, El Paso, Jefferson, Larimer, and Weld, and between those points and all points within the state of Colorado, with the first passenger in the taxicab having exclusive use of the taxicab unless the passenger agrees to multiple loadings.

"Motor carrier" means any person owning, controlling, operating, or managing a motor vehicle that provides transportation in intrastate commerce pursuant to this article; except that the term does not include a transportation network company, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3), or a transportation network company driver, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (4).

"Motor vehicle" means any automobile, truck, tractor, motor bus, or other self-propelled vehicle or any trailer drawn thereby.

"Mover" means a motor carrier that provides the transportation or shipment of household goods.

"Nonconsensual towing", "nonconsensual tow", "towed nonconsensually", "nonconsensually tow", or "towed without consent" means the transportation of a vehicle by tow truck from private property if the transportation is performed without the prior consent of:

The owner of the vehicle, authorized operator of the vehicle, or agent of the owner of the vehicle;

The lienholder of the vehicle or agent of the lienholder, unless the vehicle is being towed for the purpose of repossession under a lien agreement; or

If the owner signs a release authorizing an insurance company to act on behalf of the owner, the insurance company or agent of the insurance company providing insurance coverage on the vehicle.

"Permit" means the permit issued to a contract carrier under part 2 of this article 10.1 or to a motor carrier under part 3, 4, 5, or 7 of this article 10.1.

"Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, or other legal entity and any person acting as or in the capacity of lessee, trustee, or receiver thereof, whether appointed by a court or otherwise.

"Public highway" means every street, road, or highway in this state over which the public generally has a right to travel.

"Shipper" means a person who uses the services of a mover to transport or ship household goods.

"Taxicab" means a motor vehicle with a seating capacity of eight or less, including the driver, operated in taxicab service.

"Taxicab service" means passenger transportation in a taxicab on a call-and-demand basis, with the first passenger therein having exclusive use of the taxicab unless such passenger agrees to multiple loadings.

"Towing carrier" means a motor carrier that:

Provides, as one of its primary functions, the towing of motor vehicles by use of a tow truck; and

May also provide storage of towed vehicles.

"Tow truck" means a motor vehicle specially designed or equipped for transporting another motor vehicle by means of winches, cables, pulleys, or other equipment for towing, pulling, or lifting such other motor vehicle from one place to another.

"Vehicle booting company" means a private corporation, partnership, or sole proprietor in the business of immobilizing a motor vehicle through use of a boot.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 395, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2014:

(6) and (10) amended, (SB 14-125), ch. 323, p. 1409, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

IP, (4), and (14) amended and (9.5) added, (HB 18-1320), ch. 363, p. 2165, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(22) added, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3312, § 19, effective May 30.

L. 2022:

(1.5), (4.5), and (6.5) added and (13) amended, (HB 22-1314), ch. 416, p. 2935, § 7, effective August 10.

40-10.1-102. Powers of commission.

The commission has the power to and shall administer and enforce this article, including the right to inspect the motor vehicles, facilities, and records and documents, regardless of the format, of the motor carriers and persons involved.

The Colorado state patrol has the power to monitor and enforce compliance with the certificate and permit requirements of this article and article 10.5 of this title.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 397, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (HB 12-1019), ch. 135, p. 465, § 7, effective July 1.

40-10.1-103. Subject to control by commission.

All common carriers and contract carriers are declared to be public utilities within the meaning of articles 1 to 7 of this title and are declared to be affected with a public interest and subject to this article and articles 1 to 7 of this title, including the regulation of all rates and charges pertaining to public utilities, so far as applicable, and other laws of this state not in conflict therewith.

Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, motor carriers are not public utilities under this title, but are declared to be affected with a public interest and are subject to regulation to the extent provided in this article, in section 40-2-110.5, in article 6 of this title, and in article 7 of this title except sections 40-7-113.5, 40-7-116.5, and 40-7-117. The term "public utility", when used in articles 6 and 7 of this title, includes all motor carriers.

Transportation network companies, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3), are not common carriers, contract carriers, or motor carriers under this title, but are declared to be affected with a public interest and are subject to regulation to the extent provided in part 6 of this article.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 397, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2014:

(3) added, (SB 14-125), ch. 323, p. 1409, § 4, effective June 5.

40-10.1-104. Compliance.

A person shall not operate or offer to operate as a motor carrier in this state except in accordance with this article.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 398, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-105. Transportation not subject to regulation.

The following types of transportation are not subject to regulation pursuant to this article 10.1:

A ridesharing arrangement, as defined in section 39-22-509 (1)(a)(II), C.R.S.;

The transportation of children to and from school, school-related activities, and school-sanctioned activities to the extent that the transportation is provided by vehicles owned or directly leased by a school or school district or the school or school district's transportation contractors; except that this subsection (1)(b) does not apply to transportation network company services provided under a contract between a transportation network company and a school or school district;

A private individual who transports a neighbor or friend on a trip;

Transportation by hearses, ambulances, secure transportation, as defined in section 25-3.5-103 (11.4), or other emergency vehicles;

Transportation by motor vehicles designed and used for the nonemergency transportation of individuals with disabilities as defined in section 42-7-510 (2)(b), C.R.S.;

An amusement ride consisting of a towed vehicle that is incapable of operating under its own power, the principal purpose of which is to carry individuals over short distances for their enjoyment and by which the provision of a transportation service is only incidental;

People service transportation and volunteer transportation pursuant to article 1.1 of this title;

Transportation by vehicles operated upon fixed rails;

Transportation of property, except transportation provided by a towing carrier or a mover;

Transportation performed by the federal government, a state, or any agency or political subdivision of either, whether through an intergovernmental agreement, contractual arrangement, or otherwise; except that this subsection (1)(j) does not apply to transportation network company services provided under a contract between a transportation network company and the federal government, a state, or any agency or political subdivision of either.

Transportation of repossessed property by a secured creditor or assignee, or by a repossessor on behalf of a secured creditor or assignee, when repossessing pursuant to section 4-9-629; and

Transportation by motor vehicles when those motor vehicles are being used for nonmedical transportation and nonemergency medical transportation provided through medicaid pursuant to section 25.5-1-802.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 398, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

IP(1) and (1)(d) amended, (HB 21-1085), ch. 355, p. 2313, § 7, effective June 27; IP(1), (1)(j), and (1)(k) amended and (1)(l) added, (HB 21-1206), ch. 381, p. 2552, § 2, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

(1)(b) and (1)(j) amended, (SB 22-144), ch. 267, p. 1939, § 2, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection IP(1) by HB 21-1085 and HB 21-1206 were harmonized.

40-10.1-106. Commission to make rules and prescribe rates.

The commission has the authority and duty to prescribe such reasonable rules covering the operations of motor carriers as may be necessary for the effective administration of this article, including rules on the following subjects:

Ensuring public safety, financial responsibility, consumer protection, service quality, and the provision of services to the public;

The circumstances under which a towing carrier may perform a nonconsensual tow of a motor vehicle, the responsibilities and facilities of the towing carrier for the care or storage of the motor vehicle and its contents, and the minimum and maximum rates and charges to be collected by the towing carrier for the nonconsensual towing and storage of the motor vehicle. In setting the rates and charges pursuant to this section, the commission may require towing carriers performing nonconsensual tows to submit financial statements or other financial information to determine the costs associated with the performance of nonconsensual towing and any motor vehicle storage incident thereto.

The administration of the fingerprint-based criminal history record checks required by section 40-10.1-110.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 399, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-107. Financial responsibility - filing.

Each motor carrier shall maintain and file with the commission evidence of financial responsibility in such sum, for such protection, and in such form as the commission may by rule require as the commission deems necessary to adequately safeguard the public interest.

The financial responsibility required by subsection (1) of this section must be in the form of a liability insurance policy issued by an insurance carrier or insurer authorized to do business in this state, or a surety bond issued by a company authorized to do business in this state, or proof of self-insurance.

An insurance policy, surety bond, or self-insurance pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be kept continuously effective during the life of a certificate or permit and the commission shall require such evidence of continued validity as the commission deems necessary.

No termination of an insurance policy or surety bond is valid unless the insurer or surety has notified both the holder of the policy or bond and the commission at least thirty days before the effective date of the termination.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 399, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-108. Commission to make safety rules.

The commission has the authority and duty to establish, for motor carriers subject to parts 2, 3, and 7 of this article 10.1, reasonable rules to promote safety of operation.

For the purpose of carrying out this section pertaining to safety, the commission may obtain the assistance of any agency of the United States or of this state having special knowledge of any matter necessary to promote the safety of operation and equipment of motor vehicles. In adopting such rules, the commission shall use as general guidelines the standards contained in the current rules and regulations of the United States department of transportation relating to safety regulations, qualifications of drivers, driving of motor vehicles, parts and accessories, recording and reporting of accidents, hours of service of drivers, and inspection and maintenance of motor vehicles.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 400, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1320), ch. 363, p. 2165, § 5, effective August 8.

40-10.1-109. Motor carrier compliance with safety rules.

A motor carrier subject to part 2, 3, or 7 of this article 10.1 shall comply with the safety rules adopted by the commission pursuant to section 40-10.1-108.

A motor carrier operating a motor vehicle that is defined as a commercial vehicle in section 42-4-235 (1)(a), C.R.S., shall comply with the safety rules adopted by the department of public safety pursuant to section 24-33.5-203 (1)(b), C.R.S., in addition to the rules adopted by the commission under subsection (1) of this section.

Nothing in subsection (1) or (2) of this section diminishes the authority of the commission, the department of public safety, a peace officer, or any other agent of government to enforce the laws of this state.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 400, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1320), ch. 363, p. 2165, § 6, effective August 8.

40-10.1-110. Record check - rules.

An individual who wishes to drive: A taxicab for a motor carrier that is the holder of a certificate to provide taxicab service issued under part 2 of this article 10.1; a motor vehicle for a motor carrier that is the holder of a permit to operate as a charter bus, children's activity bus, luxury limousine, or off-road scenic charter under part 3 of this article 10.1; or a motor vehicle for a motor carrier that is the holder of a permit to operate as a large-market taxicab service under part 7 of this article 10.1 must have the individual's fingerprints taken by a local law enforcement agency or any third party approved by the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of obtaining a fingerprint-based criminal history record check.

If an approved third party takes the individual's fingerprints, the fingerprints may be electronically captured using Colorado bureau of investigation-approved livescan equipment. Third-party vendors shall not keep the individual's information for more than thirty days unless requested to do so by the individual. The individual shall submit payment for the fingerprints and for actual costs of the record check at the time the fingerprints are submitted to the Colorado bureau of investigation.

Upon receipt of fingerprints and payment for the costs, the Colorado bureau of investigation shall conduct a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check using records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation and shall forward the results of the criminal history record check to the commission.

(1.5) When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check of an individual performed pursuant to this section reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the commission shall require the individual to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d). The individual shall pay the costs associated with a name-based judicial record check.

An individual whose fingerprints are checked in accordance with subsection (1) of this section may, pending the results of the criminal history record check, drive the motor vehicles for the motor carrier described in subsection (1) of this section for up to ninety days after the fingerprints are forwarded to the Colorado bureau of investigation or until the commission receives the results of the check, whichever occurs first. The commission may temporarily extend the ninety-day period, in accordance with section 24-33.5-412 (7), based on a delay in processing criminal history record checks by the Colorado bureau of investigation or on other exigent circumstances beyond the commission's control. Upon the commission's receipt of the results, the individual may resume driving motor vehicles for the motor carrier described in subsection (1) of this section, so long as the driving does not violate applicable law and does not occur while the individual has a criminal conviction that disqualifies the individual from driving a motor vehicle in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.

An individual whose record is checked pursuant to this section is disqualified and prohibited from driving motor vehicles for the motor carrier described in subsection (1) of this section if the record check reflects that:

The individual is not of good moral character, as determined by the commission based on the results of the check;

The individual has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude.

As used in this paragraph (b), "moral turpitude" includes any unlawful sexual offense against a child, as defined in section 18-3-411, C.R.S., or a comparable offense in any other state or in the United States.

Within the two years immediately preceding the date the record check is completed, the individual was:

Convicted in this state of driving under the influence, as defined in section 42-4-1301 (1)(f), C.R.S.; driving with excessive alcoholic content, as described in section 42-4-1301 (2)(a), C.R.S.; or driving while ability impaired, as defined in section 42-4-1301 (1)(g), C.R.S.; or

Convicted of a comparable offense in any other state or in the United States.

The commission shall consider the information resulting from the record check in its determination as to whether the individual has met the standards set forth in section 24-5-101 (2).

An individual whose fingerprints were checked pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall, as a condition of continued qualification to drive a motor vehicle for a motor carrier, resubmit a set of his or her fingerprints to the commission in accordance with the commission's rules.

Each motor carrier described in subsection (1) of this section shall ensure driver compliance with this section and with commission rules promulgated pursuant to this section. Nothing in this subsection (6) makes a driver an employee of the motor carrier.

The commission shall, consistent with the requirements of this section, promulgate rules concerning the employment of, contracting with, and retention of an individual whose record is checked pursuant to this section, and the frequency and circumstances requiring resubmission of fingerprints.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 400, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (SB 13-192), ch. 129, p. 431, § 1, effective April 19; (3)(c)(I) amended, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1887, § 20, effective May 28.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1097), ch. 186, p. 655, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1320), ch. 363, p. 2165, § 7, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1.5) added, (HB 19-1166), ch. 125, p. 558, § 50, effective April 18; (1) and (2) amended, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3313, § 20, effective May 30.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 21-1206), ch. 381, p. 2553, § 3, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

(1.5), IP(3), IP(3)(c), (4), and (7) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 533, § 54, effective April 21.

40-10.1-111. Filing, issuance, and annual fees.

A motor carrier shall pay the commission the following fees in amounts prescribed in this section or, if not prescribed in this section, as set administratively by the commission with approval of the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies:

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), the filing fee for an application for a temporary authority, certificate, or permit under part 2 of this article or for an extension, amendment, transfer, or lease of a temporary authority, certificate, or permit is thirty-five dollars, and the fee for issuance of a temporary authority, certificate, or permit under part 2 of this article is five dollars.

The commission shall administratively set the annual filing fee for a permit to operate under part 7 of this article 10.1 to provide large-market taxicab service.

The filing fee for a permit to operate under part 4 or part 8 of this article 10.1 is administratively set by the commission to cover the direct and indirect cost of implementing parts 4 and 8 of this article 10.1, but the fee amount must be approved by the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies.

Repealed.

The commission shall administratively set the annual filing fee for a permit to operate under part 5 of this article; except that the fee may not exceed three hundred twenty-five dollars.

The filing fee for a temporary permit to operate as a mover pursuant to section 40-10.1-502 (5)(a) is one hundred fifty dollars.

The commission shall administratively set the annual fee for each motor vehicle a motor carrier owns, controls, operates, or manages.

Except for a mover holding a permit issued under part 5 of this article and a motor carrier that has paid a fee pursuant to article 10.5 of this title, a motor carrier shall not operate any motor vehicle in intrastate commerce unless the annual fees required by paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section have been paid. Such fees apply on a calendar year basis and are creditable only to the specific vehicles for which the fees have been paid.

Administratively set fees must be based on the appropriation made for the purposes specified in section 40-2-110 (2)(a)(I), subject to the approval of the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies, such that the revenue generated from all motor carrier fees approximates the direct and indirect costs of the commission in the supervision and regulation of motor carriers.

The commission shall transmit all fees collected under this section to the state treasurer, who shall credit them to the public utilities commission motor carrier fund created in section 40-2-110.5.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 402, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 12-1327), ch. 217, p. 931, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, (HB 18-1320), ch. 363, p. 2166, § 8, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1)(c)(I) amended, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3333, § 28, effective May 30.

L. 2022:

(1)(c)(I) amended, (HB 22-1314), ch. 416, p. 2936, § 8, effective August 10.

40-10.1-112. Commission may take action against certificate or permit.

Except as specified in subsection (3) of this section, the commission, at any time, by order duly entered, after hearing upon notice to the motor carrier and upon proof of violation, may issue an order to cease and desist or may suspend, revoke, alter, or amend any certificate or permit issued to the motor carrier under this article for the following reasons:

A violation of this article or of any term or condition of the motor carrier's certificate or permit;

Exceeding the authority granted by a certificate or permit;

A violation or refusal to observe any of the proper orders or rules of the commission;

For a towing carrier, a violation of any of the provisions set forth in part 18 or 21 of article 4 of title 42, C.R.S., or a conviction, guilty plea, or plea of nolo contendere to a felony;

For a mover, failure or refusal to abide by the terms of an arbitrator's award under section 40-10.1-507, or failure to satisfy the requirements for a new or renewed permit under section 40-10.1-502.

Any person may file a complaint against a motor carrier for a violation of this article or a rule adopted under this article. The complainant may request any relief that the commission, in its authority, may grant, including an order to cease and desist, suspension or revocation of the motor carrier's certificate or permit, or assessment of civil penalties. Upon proof of violation, the commission may issue an order to cease and desist, suspend or revoke the motor carrier's certificate or permit, assess civil penalties as provided in article 7 of this title, or take any other action within the commission's authority. In assessing civil penalties under this subsection (2), the commission is not constrained by the procedural requirements of section 40-7-116.

Notwithstanding the notice and hearing provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall summarily suspend the certificate or permit of any motor carrier for failure to maintain effective insurance or surety bond coverage and file evidence of the same in accordance with section 40-10.1-107 and rules adopted pursuant thereto. The commission shall reinstate such summarily suspended certificate or permit within a time period specified in, and in accordance with, the rules of the commission.

A motor carrier whose certificate or permit has been revoked for cause more than twice is not eligible for another such certificate or permit for at least two years after the date of the third such revocation. In the case of an entity, the two-year period of ineligibility also applies to all principals, officers, and directors of the entity, whether or not any such principal, officer, or director applies individually or as a principal, officer, or director of the same or a different entity. As used in this subsection (4), "revoked for cause" does not include a revocation for failure to carry the required insurance unless it is shown that the person knowingly operated without insurance.

Any commission action under subsection (1) or (2) of this section must conform to the provisions and procedures specified in article 6 of this title. The motor carrier has all the rights to the opportunity for a hearing, review, and appeal as to such order or ruling of the commission as are now provided by articles 1 to 7 of this title. No appeal from or review of any order or ruling of the commission supersedes or suspends such order or rulings unless specifically ordered by the proper court.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 403, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-113. Penalty for violations.

Any person who provides transportation in intrastate commerce without first obtaining a certificate or permit, violates any of the terms thereof, fails or refuses to make any return or report required by the commission, denies to the commission access to the books and records of such person, or makes any false return or report commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 404, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3298, § 701, effective March 1, 2022.

40-10.1-114. Penalty for violation of article.

Every motor carrier and every officer, agent, or employee of a motor carrier and every other person who violates or fails to comply with or who procures, aids, or abets in the violation of this article, who fails to obey, observe, or comply with any order, decision, or rule of the commission adopted under this article, or who procures, aids, or abets any person in such failure to obey or observe such order, decision, or rule commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

An individual who is employed by or who contracts with a motor carrier and who operates a motor vehicle for the motor carrier's business in violation of section 40-10.1-110 commits a petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

Each day of a continuing violation of this article constitutes a separate offense.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 404, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3298, § 702, effective March 1, 2022.

40-10.1-115. Jurisdiction of courts.

The district court or, within its jurisdiction, the county court of any county in or through which a motor carrier operates has jurisdiction in all matters arising under this article on account of the operations of such motor carrier except as otherwise provided in this article and excepting those matters expressly delegated to the commission; and it is the duty of the district attorney for the county having jurisdiction to prosecute all violations of this article.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 404, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-116. Commission to notify local authorities - procedure.

Whenever the commission is of the opinion that a motor carrier is failing or omitting to do anything required of it by law or by any order, decision, rule, direction, or requirement of the commission or is acting or is about to act or permitting an act or about to permit an act in violation of the law or of any order, decision, rule, direction, or requirement of the commission, the commission shall request the attorney general of the state or the district attorney of any district to commence an action or proceeding in the district court in and for the county or city and county in which the cause or some part thereof arose or in which the motor carrier complained of maintains a principal place of business or resides. Such action or proceeding must be conducted in accordance with section 40-7-104; except that references in section 40-7-104 to the attorney general include any district attorney bringing the action or proceeding.

Appellate review may be obtained in the supreme court concerning a final judgment in an action or proceeding under this section in the same manner and with the same effect, subject to this article, as appellate review of judgments of the district court in other actions for mandamus or injunction.

A person injured by the noncompliance of a motor carrier with this article or any other provision of law or an order, decision, rule, direction, or requirement of the commission may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for the enforcement thereof, and the court has jurisdiction to enforce obedience thereto by injunction or other proper process, mandatory or otherwise, and to restrain the motor carrier and its officers, agents, employees, or representatives from further disobedience thereof, or to enjoin upon them obedience to the same, and any person so injured has cause of action in damages and is privileged to pursue the usual and proper remedies as in any other case.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 405, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-117. Limited regulation of transportation network companies.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, transportation network companies, as defined in section 40-10.1-602 (3), are governed exclusively under part 6 of this article.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-125), ch. 323, p. 1409, § 5, effective June 5.

40-10.1-118. Certificated taxi carrier parity report - recommendations - legislative declaration - repeal.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

When the general assembly enacted Senate Bill 21-260, enacted in 2021, it established a policy that a sustainable transportation system must be funded adequately and equitably with contributions from users that bear a reasonable relationship to their use of and impacts on the system and the environment and the costs incurred in mitigating those impacts;

As a result of the enactment of Senate Bill 21-260, enacted in 2021, on and after July 1, 2022, transportation network companies will pay per ride fees for each prearranged ride requested and accepted through their digital networks, but authorized taxi carriers will not be required to pay per ride fees; and

Consistent with the policy that the transportation system be funded adequately and equitably with contributions from users, it is necessary and appropriate to assess whether there is parity between authorized taxi carriers and transportation network companies with respect to their contributions to the funding of the transportation system.

The staff of the commission shall report whether, taking into account any relevant differences in their business models, regulatory burdens, and impacts on the sustainability of the transportation system, there is parity between authorized taxi carriers and transportation network companies with respect to their contributions to the funding of the transportation system. The staff of the commission shall report its findings to the transportation legislation review committee of the general assembly created in section 43-2-145 (1)(a) during the 2023 legislative interim.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1404, § 22, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.